Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1785
Residential real property; sale; proration of taxes due.

Whenever residential real property is sold, the property taxes due on such real property for the year in which the sale occurred shall be prorated based on the number of days the buyer and seller owned the property during such year, unless the buyer and seller have agreed to a different proration of such property taxes.

Laws 2021, LB466, § 1.